Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,349
Minibikes
and similar vehicles; sale; notice.

All minibikes
and similar two-wheeled, three-wheeled, and four-wheeled miniature vehicles
offered for sale in this state shall bear the following notice to the customer
and user: This vehicle as manufactured or sold is for off-road use only. This
section shall not apply to a golf
car vehicle or a low-speed vehicle, as applicable to its design,
or to an electric personal assistive mobility device.

Laws 1971, LB 644, § 8;

Laws 1972, LB 1196, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2103;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 445;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 464;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 34;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 22.